Montana, session 2025, HB378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 7-2-4203, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-2-4203. Imposition of conditions for approval of addition. (1) The council has power by
ordinance to compel the owners of these additions to lay out streets, avenues, and alleys that correspond in
width and direction and are continuations of the streets, avenues, and alleys in the city or town or in the addition
contiguous to or near the proposed addition.
(2) The owner of any addition has no rights or privileges unless the owner complies with the terms
and conditions of the ordinance and the plat has been submitted to, approved by, and endorsed by the mayor
and council.
(3) The council may not compel the owner of an addition to:
(a) pay a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at specified sale
prices; or
(b) dedicate real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices.
(4) A dedication of real property as prohibited in subsection (3)(b) includes a payment or other
contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of real property for future development of housing for
specified income levels or specified sale prices."

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
Section 2. Section 76-2-203, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-203. Criteria and guidelines for zoning regulations. (1) Zoning regulations must be:
(a) made in accordance with the growth policy; and
(b) designed to:
(i) secure safety from fire and other dangers;
(ii) promote public health, public safety, and general welfare; and
(iii) facilitate the adequate provision of transportation, water, sewerage, schools, parks, and other
public requirements.
(2) In the adoption of zoning regulations, the board of county commissioners shall consider:
(a) reasonable provision of adequate light and air;
(b) the effect on motorized and nonmotorized transportation systems;
(c) compatible urban growth in the vicinity of cities and towns that at a minimum must include the
areas around municipalities;
(d) the character of the district and its peculiar suitability for particular uses; and
(e) conserving the value of buildings and encouraging the most appropriate use of land throughout
the jurisdictional area.
(3) Zoning regulations must, as nearly as possible, be made compatible with the zoning
ordinances of nearby municipalities.
(4) Zoning regulations may not include a requirement to:
(a) pay a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at specified sale
prices; or
(b) dedicate real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices.
(5) A dedication of real property as prohibited in subsection (4)(b) includes a payment or other
contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of real property for future development of housing for
specified income levels or specified sale prices."

Section 3. Section 76-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
"76-2-302. Zoning districts. (1) For the purposes of 76-2-301, the local city or town council or other
legislative body may divide the municipality into districts of the number, shape, and area as are considered best
suited to carry out the purposes of this part. Within the districts, it may regulate and restrict the erection,
construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of buildings, structures, or land, including the creation of
zoning districts that allow tiny dwelling units.
(2) All regulations must be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each district, but
the regulations in one district may differ from those in other districts.
(3) In a proceeding for a permit or variance to place manufactured housing within a residential
zoning district, there is a rebuttable presumption that placement of a manufactured home will not adversely
affect property values of conventional housing.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Manufactured housing" means a single-family dwelling, built offsite in a factory, that is in
compliance with the applicable prevailing standards of the United States department of housing and urban
development at the time of its production. A manufactured home does not include a mobile home or
housetrailer, as defined in 15-1-101.
(b) (i) "Tiny dwelling unit" means a residential dwelling unit that is 350 to 750 square feet, is on a
permanent foundation, and is used as a single-family dwelling for at least 45 days or longer.
(ii) Appendix Q, tiny houses, of the International Building Code as it was printed on January 1,
2023, may govern all other requirements of a tiny dwelling unit that is 350 to 750 square feet.
(5) This section may not be construed to limit conditions imposed in historic districts, local design
review standards, existing covenants, or the ability to enter into covenants pursuant to Title 70, chapter 17, part
2. Local design review standards imposed by a local government must be clear, objective, and necessary to
protect public health or safety or to comply with federal law.
(6) Zoning regulations may not include a requirement to:
(a) pay a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at specified sale
prices; or
(b) dedicate real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices.
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
(7) A dedication of real property as prohibited in subsection (6)(b) includes a payment or other
contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of real property for future development of housing for
specified income levels or specified sale prices.
(8)(6) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8)(b) (6)(b), when reviewing an application for a zoning
permit or variance from local design review standards, the determination of compliance with local design review
standards as provided in subsection (5) must be conducted by employees of the municipality, and the
municipality may not require review by an external board.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) (6)(a) does not apply to historic preservation boards reviewing an application
for a permit or variance to structures or districts that the local government has designated as historic or that are
listed on the national register of historic places as defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 as it
read on October 1, 2023."

Section 4. Section 76-25-303, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-25-303. Limitations on zoning authority. (1) A local government acting pursuant to this part
may not:
(a) treat manufactured housing units differently from any other residential units;
(b) include in a zoning regulation any requirement to:
(i) pay a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at specified sale
prices; or
(ii) dedicate real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices, including a payment or other contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of
real property for future development of housing for specified income levels or specified sale prices;
(c)(b) prevent the erection of an amateur radio antenna at heights and dimensions sufficient to
accommodate amateur radio service communications by a person who holds an unrevoked and unexpired
official amateur radio station license and operator's license, "technician" or higher class, issued by the federal
communications commission of the United States;
(d)(c) establish a maximum height limit for an amateur radio antenna of less than 100 feet above the
ground;
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
(e)(d) subject to subsection (2) and outside of incorporated municipalities, prevent the complete use,
development, or recovery of any mineral, forest, or agricultural resources identified in the land use plan, except
that the use, development, or recovery may be reasonably conditioned or prohibited within residential zones;
(f)(e) except as provided in subsection (3), treat the following differently from any other residential
use of property:
(i) a foster home, kinship foster home, youth shelter care facility, or youth group home operated
under the provisions of 52-2-621 through 52-2-623, if the home or facility provides care on a 24-hour-a-day
basis;
(ii) a community residential facility serving eight or fewer persons, if the facility provides care on a
24-hour-a-day basis; or
(iii) a family day-care home or a group day-care home registered by the department of public
health and human services under Title 52, chapter 2, part 7;
(g)(f) except as provided in subsection (3), apply any safety or sanitary regulation of the department
of public health and human services or any other agency of the state or a political subdivision of the state that is
not applicable to residential occupancies in general to a community residential facility serving 8 or fewer
persons or to a day-care home serving 12 or fewer children; or
(h)(g) prohibit any existing agricultural activities or force the termination of any existing agricultural
activities outside the boundaries of an incorporated city, including agricultural activities that were established
outside the corporate limits of a municipality and thereafter annexed into the municipality.
(2) Regulations that condition or prohibit uses pursuant to subsection (1)(e) (1)(d) must be in effect
prior to the filing of a permit application or at the time a written request is received for a preapplication meeting
pursuant to 82-4-432.
(3) Except for a day-care home registered by the department of public health and human services,
a local government may impose zoning standards and conditions on any type of home or facility identified in
subsections (1)(e) and (1)(f) and (1)(g) if those zoning standards and conditions do not conflict with the
requirements of subsections (1)(e) and (1)(f) and (1)(g)."

Section 5. Section 76-25-401, MCA, is amended to read:
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
"76-25-401. Authority to adopt local subdivision regulations -- limitations. (1) (a) Within its
respective jurisdiction, a local government shall regulate the creation of lots in substantial compliance with its
adopted land use plan and zoning regulations by adopting subdivision regulations.
(b) The governing body of a county or city has the authority to adopt subdivision regulations in
accordance with this part by an ordinance that substantially complies with 7-5-103 through 7-5-107.
(c) A municipality shall adopt subdivision regulations for those portions of the jurisdictional area
outside the boundaries of the municipality that the governing body anticipates may be annexed into the
municipality over the next 20 years. Unless otherwise agreed to by the applicable jurisdictions, subdivision
regulations on property outside the municipal boundaries may not apply or be enforced until the areas are
annexed or being annexed into the municipality.
(2) The subdivision regulations must provide a process for the application and consideration of
subdivision exemptions, certificates of survey, preliminary plats, and final plats as necessary for the
implementation of this chapter.
(3) (a) A local governing body may not require, as a condition for approval of a subdivision under
this part:
(i) the payment of a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices; or
(ii) the dedication of real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels
or at specified sale prices.
(b) A dedication of real property prohibited in subsection (3)(a)(ii) includes a payment or other
contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of real property for future development of housing for
specified income levels or specified sale prices.
(4) The local governing body may not change, in the subdivision regulations or in the process for
subdividing, any timelines or procedural requirements for an application to subdivide other than provided for in
this part."

NEW SECTION. Section 6. Repealer. The following sections of the Montana Code Annotated are
repealed:
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 378.1
76-2-114. Housing fees and dedication of real property prohibited.
76-3-514. Housing fees and dedication of real property prohibited.
- END -
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 378